Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-125
Annexation; taxes, assessments, fines, licenses, fees, claims, demands; paid to and collection by city of the first class.

All taxes, assessments, fines, licenses, fees, claims, and demands of every kind assessed or levied against persons or property within any village or city of the second class annexed under section 16-122 shall be paid to and collected by the city of the first class.

Laws 1969, c. 72, § 4, p. 395;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 12.